Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.550

Traffic safety education officers—Powers—Pay and reimbursement.

(1) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall designate twenty-four or more officers as traffic safety education officers. The chief of the Washington state patrol shall make the designations in a manner designed to ensure that the programs under subsection (2) of this section are reasonably available in all areas of the state.

(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol may permit these traffic safety education officers to appear in their off-duty hours in uniform to give programs in schools or the community on the duties of the state patrol, traffic safety, or crime prevention.

(3) The traffic safety education officers may accept such pay and reimbursement of expenses as are approved by the state patrol from the sponsoring organization.

(4) The state patrol is encouraged to work with community organizations to set up these programs statewide.

[ 1984 c 217 s 1.]